District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
17 act may be cited as the “Cybersecurity and Accountability Amendment Act of 2026”.
18 TITLE I. CYBERSECURITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY REQUIREMENTS.
19 Sec. 101. Short title.
20 This title may be known as the “Cybersecurity and Accountability Act of 2026”.
21 Sec. 102. Definitions.
22 For the purposes of this title, the term:
23 (1) “Authorized individual” means an individual known to, and screened by, the
24 licensee, and to whom the licensee has determined access to the nonpublic information held
25 by the licensee and its information systems is necessary and appropriate.
26 (2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance,
27 Securities, and Banking.
1

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
28 (3) “Consumer” means a person, including an applicant, policyholder, insured,
29 beneficiary, claimant, or certificate holder who is a resident of the District and whose nonpublic
30 information is in a licensee’s possession, custody, or control.
31 (4) “Cybersecurity event” means an event resulting in unauthorized access to, or
32 disruption or misuse of, an information system or nonpublic information stored on the
33 information system but does not include:
34 (A) The unauthorized acquisition of encrypted nonpublic information if
35 the encryption, process, or key is not also acquired, released, or used without authorization; or
36 (B) An event where the licensee has determined that the nonpublic
37 information accessed by an unauthorized person has not been used or released and has been
38 returned or destroyed.
39 (5) “Department” means the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.
40 (6) “Encrypted” means the transformation of data into a form which results in a
41 low probability of assigning meaning to the data without the use of a protective process or key.
42 (7) “Information security program” means the administrative, technical, and
43 physical safeguards that a licensee uses to access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use,
44 transmit, dispose of, or otherwise handle nonpublic information.
45 (8) “Information system” means a discrete set of electronic information resources
46 organized for the collection, processing, maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition
47 of electronic information, as well as any specialized system, such as an industrial or process
2

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
48 controls system, telephone switching and private branch exchange system, or environmental
49 control system.
50 (9) “Licensee” means any person licensed, authorized to operate, or registered, or
51 required to be licensed, authorized, or registered by the Department, as an insurance producer or
52 insurer, as those terms are defined under section 2(6) and (7) of the Producer Licensing Act of
53 2002, effective March 27, 2003 (D.C. Law 14-264; D.C. Official Code § 31-1131.02(6) and (7));
54 except, that the term “licensee” shall not include a purchasing or a risk retention group chartered
55 and licensed in a jurisdiction other than the District or a person acting as an assuming insurer that
56 is domiciled in another state or jurisdiction.
57 (10) “Multi-factor authentication” means authentication through verification of at
58 least 2 of the following types of authentication factors:
59 (A) Knowledge factors, such as a password;
60 (B) Possession factors, such as a token or text message on a mobile phone;
61 or
62 (C) Inherence factors, such as a biometric characteristic.
63 (11) “Nonpublic information” means information that is not publicly available
64 information and is:
65 (A) Business-related information of a licensee, the tampering with, or
66 unauthorized disclosure, access, or use of which, would cause a material adverse impact to the
67 business, operations, or security of the licensee;
3

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
68 (B) Any information concerning a consumer that, because of name,
69 number, personal mark, or other identifier, can be used to identify the consumer, in combination
70 with at least one of the following data elements:
71 (i) Social Security number;
72 (ii) Driver’s license number or non-driver identification card
73 number;
74 (iii) Bank account number or credit or debit card number;
75 (iv) Any security code, access code, or password that would permit
76 access to a consumer’s financial account; or
77 (v) Biometric records; or
78 (C) Any information or data, except age or gender, in any form or medium
79 created by, or derived from, a health care provider or a consumer and that relates to the:
80 (i) Past, present, or future physical, mental, or behavioral health or
81 condition of a consumer or a member of the consumer’s family;
82 (ii) Provision of health care to a consumer; or
83 (iii) Payment for the provision of health care to a consumer.
84 (12)(A) “Publicly available information” means any information that a licensee
85 has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public from:
86 (i) Federal, state, or local government records;
87 (ii) Widely distributed media; or
4

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
88 (iii) Disclosures to the general public that are required to be made
89 by federal, state, or local law.
90 (B) For purposes of this paragraph, a licensee has a reasonable basis to
91 believe that information is lawfully made available to the general public if the licensee has taken
92 steps to determine:
93 (i) That the information is of the type that is available to the
94 general public; and
95 (ii) Whether a consumer can direct that the information not be
96 made available to the general public and, if so, that the consumer has chosen not to do so.
97 (13) “Risk assessment” means the assessment that a licensee is required to
98 conduct under section 103(b).
99 (14) “Third-Party service provider” means a person that is not a licensee and that
100 contracts with a licensee to maintain, process, or store nonpublic information, or otherwise is
101 permitted access to nonpublic information through its provision of services to the licensee.
102 Sec. 103. Information security program.
103 (a) Each licensee shall develop, implement, and maintain a comprehensive written
104 information security program based on the licensee’s risk assessment, which shall include
105 administrative, technical, and physical safeguards for the protection of nonpublic information
106 and the licensee’s information system. The information security program shall:
5

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
107 (1) Be designed to protect the security and confidentiality of nonpublic
108 information and the security of the information system;
109 (2) Be designed to protect against any threats or hazards to the security or
110 integrity of nonpublic information and the information system;
111 (3) Be designed to protect against unauthorized access to, or use of, nonpublic
112 information, and minimize the likelihood of harm to any consumer; and
113 (4) Define and periodically reevaluate a schedule for the retention of nonpublic
114 information and a mechanism for its destruction when no longer needed.
115 (b) The licensee shall conduct a risk assessment as part of its obligations to establish an
116 information security system, which shall:
117 (1) Designate one or more employees, an affiliate, or an outside vendor
118 designated to act on behalf of the licensee who is responsible for the licensee’s information
119 security program;
120 (2) Identify reasonably foreseeable internal or external threats that could result in
121 unauthorized access, transmission, disclosure, misuse, alteration, or destruction of nonpublic
122 information, including the security of information systems and nonpublic information that are
123 accessible to, or held by, third-party service providers;
124 (3) Assess the likelihood and potential damage of these threats, taking into
125 consideration the sensitivity of the nonpublic information;
6

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
126 (4) Assess the sufficiency of policies, procedures, information systems, and other
127 safeguards in place to manage these threats, including consideration of threats in each relevant
128 area of the licensee’s operations, including:
129 (A) Employee training and management;
130 (B) Information systems, including network and software design,
131 information classification, governance, processing, storage, transmission, and disposal; and
132 (C) Detecting, preventing, and responding to attacks, intrusions, or other
133 systems failures; and
134 (5) Implement information safeguards to manage the threats identified under
135 paragraph (2) of this subsection in an operative continuous assessment, and, on an annual basis,
136 assess the effectiveness of the safeguards’ key controls, systems, and procedures.
137 (c) Based on its risk assessment, the licensee’s information security system shall:
138 (1) Be designed to mitigate the identified risks, commensurate with the size and
139 complexity of the licensee’s activities, including its use of third-party service providers and the
140 sensitivity of the nonpublic information and certain public information, including personally
141 identifiable information, used by the licensee or in the licensee’s possession, custody, or control;
142 (2) Assess which of the following security measures are appropriate and
143 implement such security measures:
144 (A) Place access controls on information systems, including controls to
145 authenticate and permit access only by authorized individuals;
7

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
146 (B) Identify and manage the data, personnel, devices, systems, and
147 facilities that enable the licensee to achieve business purposes in accordance with their relative
148 importance to business objectives and the licensee’s risk assessment;
149 (C) Restrict access at physical locations containing nonpublic information
150 only to authorized individuals;
151 (D) Protect by encryption or other appropriate means all nonpublic
152 information while being transmitted over an external network and all nonpublic information
153 stored on a laptop computer or other portable computing or storage device or media;
154 (E) Adopt secure development practices for in-house developed
155 applications utilized by the licensee and procedures for evaluating, assessing, or testing the
156 security of externally developed applications utilized by the licensee;
157 (F) Modify the information system in accordance with the licensee’s
158 information security program;
159 (G) Utilize effective controls, which may include multi-factor
160 authentication procedures, for any individual accessing nonpublic information;
161 (H) Regularly test and monitor systems and procedures to detect actual
162 and attempted attacks on, or intrusion into, information systems;
163 (I) Include audit trails within the information security program designed to
164 detect and respond to cybersecurity events and to reconstruct material financial transactions
165 sufficient to support normal operations and obligations of the licensee;
8

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
166 (J) Implement measures to protect against destruction, loss, or damage of
167 nonpublic information due to environmental hazards, such as fire and water damage or other
168 catastrophes or technological failures; and
169 (K) Develop, implement, and maintain procedures for the secure disposal
170 of nonpublic information in any format;
171 (3) Include cybersecurity risks in the licensee’s enterprise risk management
172 process;
173 (4) Stay informed on emerging threats or vulnerabilities and utilize reasonable
174 security measures when sharing information relative to the character of the sharing and the type
175 of information shared; and
176 (5) Provide personnel with cybersecurity awareness training that is updated as
177 necessary to reflect risks identified by the licensee in the risk assessment.
178 (d) Notwithstanding subsection (c)(2) of this section, the Commissioner may issue
179 additional security measures through rulemaking.
180 (e)(1) Beginning on February 15 of the year after the effective date of this title, and
181 annually thereafter, each licensee shall submit a written statement to the Commissioner
182 confirming that the insurer is in compliance with the requirements of this section.
183 (2) Each licensee shall maintain for examination by the Department all records,
184 schedules, and data supporting its annual written statement for a period of 5 years. To the extent
185 the licensee has identified areas, systems, or processes that require material improvement,
9

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
186 updating, or redesign, it shall document the identification and the remedial efforts planned and
187 underway to address those areas, systems, or processes, which shall be available for inspection
188 by the Commissioner.
189 Sec. 104. Investigation and notification of a cybersecurity event.
190 (a) If the licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has or may have occurred in its
191 information system or a system maintained by a third-party service provider, the licensee, an
192 outside vendor or service provider designated to act on behalf of the licensee, or the third-party
193 service provider shall conduct a prompt investigation, which shall at a minimum and to the
194 extent possible:
195 (1) Determine whether a cybersecurity event has occurred;
196 (2) Assess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event;
197 (3) Identify any nonpublic information that may have been involved in the
198 cybersecurity event; and
199 (4) Perform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the security of the
200 information system compromised in the cybersecurity event to prevent further unauthorized
201 acquisition, release, or use of nonpublic information in the licensee’s possession, custody, or
202 control.
203 (b) The licensee shall maintain records concerning each cybersecurity event for a period
204 of at least 5 years from the date of cybersecurity event and shall produce those records to the
205 Commissioner upon request.
10

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
206 (c) A licensee shall notify the Commissioner of a cybersecurity event no later than 3
207 business days after a determination that a cybersecurity event has occurred, if:
208 (1) The District is the licensee’s jurisdiction of domicile in the case of an insurer
209 or the District is the licensee’s home jurisdiction in the case of an insurance producer, as those
210 terms are defined in section 2(7) and (6) of the Producer Licensing Act of 2002, effective March
211 27, 2003 (D.C. Law 14-264; D.C. Official Code § 31-1131.02(7) and (6)), respectively; or
212 (2) The licensee reasonably believes that the nonpublic information involves 250
213 or more consumers residing in the District and the cybersecurity event:
214 (A) Requires notice to a government body, self-regulatory agency, or any
215 other supervisory body pursuant to any state or federal law; or
216 (B) Has a reasonable likelihood of materially harming:
217 (i) A consumer residing in the District; or
218 (ii) Any material part of the normal operations of the licensee.
219 (d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, if the cybersecurity event occurs in a
220 system maintained by a third-party service provider, the licensee shall notify the Commissioner
221 no later than 3 days after the third-party service provider notifies the licensee of the
222 cybersecurity event or the licensee has actual knowledge of the cybersecurity event, whichever is
223 sooner;
224 (e)(1)(A) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic information that is
225 used by or is in the possession, custody, or control of a licensee that is acting as an assuming
11

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
226 insurer and that does not have a direct contractual relationship with the affected consumers, the
227 assuming insurer shall notify its affected ceding insurers and the insurance regulatory agency of
228 its jurisdiction of domicile within 3 business days of determining that a cybersecurity event has
229 occurred; and
230 (B) The ceding insurers that have a direct contractual relationship with
231 affected consumers shall fulfill the consumer notification requirements imposed under D.C.
232 Official Code § 28-3852, and any other notification requirements relating to a cybersecurity
233 event imposed under this section.
234 (2)(A) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic information that is
235 in the possession, custody, or control of a third-party service provider of a licensee that is an
236 assuming insurer, the assuming insurer shall notify its affected ceding insurers and the insurance
237 regulatory agency of its jurisdiction of domicile within 3 business days of receiving notice from
238 its third-party service provider that a cybersecurity event has occurred;
239 (B) The ceding insurers that have a direct contractual relationship with
240 affected consumers shall fulfill the consumer notification requirements imposed under D.C.
241 Official Code § 28-3852, and any other notification requirements relating to a cybersecurity
242 event imposed under this section.
243 (f) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic information that is in the
244 possession, custody, or control of a licensee that is an insurer or its third-party service provider
245 for which a consumer accesses the insurer’s services through an independent insurance producer,
12

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
246 the insurer shall notify the producers of record of all affected consumers as soon as practicable as
247 directed by the Commissioner. The licensee is excused from the obligation to provide notice to
248 individual consumers where the licensee does not have the current producer of record
249 information for those consumers.
250 Sec. 105. Powers of the Commissioner and penalties.
251 (a) The Commissioner shall have the power to examine and investigate the affairs of any
252 licensee to determine whether the licensee has or is engaged in conduct in violation of this title,
253 in accordance with the Law on Examinations Act of 1993, effective October 21, 1993 (D.C. Law
254 10-49; D.C. Official Code § 31-1401 et seq.).
255 (b) An insurer found, without just cause as defined by the Commissioner by rule, to be in
256 violation of this title, after notice and hearing conducted according to the rules for contested
257 cases set forth in Chapter 38 of Title 26A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations,
258 shall pay a penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per day; except, that the maximum penalty
259 assessed shall be no more than $25,000.
260 (c) The Commissioner may, through rulemaking, establish other penalties for violations
261 of this title.
262
263 Sec. 106. Confidentiality.
264 (a)(1) Documents, materials, or other information in the control or possession of the
265 Department that are furnished by a licensee, or agent acting on behalf of a licensee, pursuant to
13

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
266 sections 103 and 104, or that are obtained by the Commissioner in an investigation or
267 examination pursuant to section 105, are confidential and privileged and shall not be subject to:
268 (A) Disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective
269 March 25, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.);
270 (B) Subpoena; or
271 (C) Discovery or be admissible in evidence in a private civil action;
272 except, that the Commissioner may use the documents, materials, or other information in the
273 furtherance of an action brought as part of the Commissioner’s duties.
274 (2) Neither the Commissioner nor any person who receives documents, materials,
275 or other information while acting under the authority of the Commissioner shall be permitted to
276 testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or
277 information received pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
278 (b) The Commissioner may:
279 (1) Share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential
280 and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (a) of this section with
281 other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the National Association of
282 Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”), its affiliates or subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and
283 international law enforcement authorities; provided, that the recipient agrees in writing to
284 maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;
285 (2) Receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise
14

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
286 confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, from the NAIC, its affiliates or
287 subsidiaries, and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic
288 jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or
289 information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under
290 the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information;
291 (3) Share documents, materials, or other information subject to subsection (a) of
292 this section, with a third-party consultant or vendor; provided, that the consultant agrees in
293 writing to maintain the confidentiality and the privileged status of the document, material, or
294 other information; and
295 (4) Enter into an agreement governing sharing and use of information consistent
296 with this subsection.
297 (c) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents,
298 materials, or information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the Commissioner under this
299 section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (c) of this section.
300 (e) Nothing in this title shall be construed to prohibit the Commissioner from sharing
301 final orders of adjudicated actions otherwise open to public inspection pursuant to the Freedom
302 of Information Act of 1976, effective March 25, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-
303 531 et seq.), to a database or other clearinghouse service maintained by the NAIC, its affiliates,
304 or subsidiaries.
305 Sec. 107. Exemptions.
15

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
306 (a) The following licensees shall be exempt from the requirements of section 103:
307 (1) A licensee with fewer than 10 employees, including any independent
308 contractors;
309 (2) A licensee subject to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
310 of 1996, approved August 21, 1996 (110 Stat. 1936; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.) (“HIPAA”), that
311 has established and maintains an information security program pursuant to HIPAA and the rules,
312 regulations, procedures, or guidelines established thereunder; provided, that the licensee submits
313 a written statement to the Commissioner certifying its compliance with HIPAA;
314 (3) A licensee having less than $5 million in annual written premiums in each of
315 the last 3 calendar years from its District of Columbia business operations;
316 (4) A licensee having less than $10 million in year-end admitted assets, calculated
317 in accordance with the NAIC’s statutory accounting principles, including admitted assets of all
318 affiliates; and
319 (5) An employee, agent, representative, or designee of a licensee, who is also a
320 licensee, to the extent that the employee, agent, representative, or designee is covered by the
321 information security program of the other licensee.
322 (b) A licensee claiming an exemption under subsection (a) of this section shall file a
323 request for an exemption in accordance with the rules prescribed by the Commissioner.
324 (c) In the event that a licensee ceases to qualify for an exception, the licensee shall have
325 180 days to comply with the requirements of this title.
16

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
326
327 Sec. 108. Rulemaking.
328 The Commissioner, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
329 Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
330 shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this title, including establishing:
331 (1) Standards and practices that shall be incorporated in a licensee’s information
332 security program, including risk assessments, the role of the licensee’s board of directors,
333 oversight of third-party service providers, and the requirement for written incident response
334 plans; and
335 (2) Guidance addressing the form and contents of the information that shall be
336 included in any initial, updated, or supplemental notification to the Commissioner concerning a
337 cybersecurity event; provided, that a licensee shall provide the Commissioner with a copy of the
338 notification of security breach sent to consumers as required by D.C. Official Code § 28-3852.
339 Sec. 109. No private right of action.
340 Nothing in this title shall be construed to create or imply a private cause of action or
341 curtail an existing private cause of action under another law.
342 TITLE II. CONFORMING AMENDMENT; FISCAL IMPACT; EFFECTIVE
343 DATE.
344 Sec. 201. Section 204(a) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 31,
345 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)), is amended as follows:
17

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
346 (a) Paragraph (23) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
347 its place.
348 (b) Paragraph (24) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
349 its place.
350 (c) A new paragraph (25) is added to read as follows:
351 “(25) Information exempt from disclosure under the Cybersecurity and
352 Accountability Act of 2026, as approved by the Committee on Health on July 8, 2026
353 (Committee print of Bill 26-427).”.
354 Sec. 202. Fiscal Impact Statement.
355 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
356 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
357 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
358 Sec. 203. Effective Date.
359 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
360 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
361 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
362 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
18